apertium-mk-bg/apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
	<pardef n="р/еже__vblex"> <!-- imperf"/><s n="tv -->
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежи</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежете</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежа</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежеш</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>еже</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежем</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e r="LR"> 	   <p>          <l>ежеме</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежете</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежат</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежех</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежеше</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежеше</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежехме</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежехте</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежеха</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежел</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежела</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежело</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежели</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещ</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещия</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещият</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежеща</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещата</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещо</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещото</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещи</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>ежещите</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>язах</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яза</l>           <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>яза</l>           <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язахме</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язахте</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язаха</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>язал</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язалия</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язалият</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язала</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язалата</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язало</l>          <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язалото</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язали</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язалите</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="lp"/><s n="aor"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

	  <e>        <p>          <l>язан</l>        <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язания</l>      <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язаният</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="subj"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язана</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язаната</l>   <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язано</l>         <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язаното</l>       <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язани</l>     <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>        <p>          <l>язаните</l>   <r>еже<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="реже"><i>р</i><par n="р/еже__vblex"/></e>
